Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-114
Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice; duties.

The Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice shall establish and maintain a central repository for the collection and analysis of information regarding criminal offenses committed against a person because of the person's race, color, religion, ancestry, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, or disability or because of the person's association with a person of a certain race, color, religion, ancestry, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, or disability. Upon establishing such a repository, the commission shall develop a procedure to monitor, record, classify, and analyze information relating to criminal offenses apparently directed against individuals or groups, or their property, because of their race, color, religion, ancestry, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, or disability or because of their association with a person of a certain race, color, religion, ancestry, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, or disability.

Laws 1997, LB 90, § 6.